Utah statutes.
26-10b-101.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Community based organization":

(a)  means a private entity; and

(b)  includes for profit and not for profit entities.

(2)  "Cultural competence" means a set of congruent behaviors, attitudes, and policies that come together in a system, agency, or profession and enables that system, agency, or profession to work effectively in cross-cultural situations.

(3)  "Health literacy" means the degree to which an individual has the capacity to obtain, process, and understand health information and services needed to make appropriate health decisions.

(4)  "Institutional capacity" means the ability of a community based organization to implement public and private contracts.

(5)  "Medically underserved population" means the population of an urban or rural area or a population group designated by the department as having a shortage of primary health care services.

(6)  "Primary health care" means:

(a)  basic and general health care services given when a person seeks assistance to screen for or to prevent illness and disease, or for simple and common illnesses and injuries; and

(b)  care given for the management of chronic diseases.

(7)  "Primary health care services" include:

(a)  services of physicians, nurses, physician's assistants, and dentists licensed to practice in this state under Title 58, Occupations and Professions;

(b)  diagnostic and radiologic services;

(c)  preventive health services including, perinatal services, well-child services, and other services that seek to prevent disease or its consequences;

(d)  emergency medical services;

(e)  preventive dental services; and

(f)  pharmaceutical services.

